Utah statutes.
58-37e-13.   Statute of limitations.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a claim under this chapter
may not be brought more than two years after the cause of action accrues.  A
cause of action accrues under this chapter when a person who may recover has
reason to know of the harm from illegal drug use that is the basis for the
cause of action and has reason to know that the illegal drug use is the cause
of the harm.
(2) (a)  For a plaintiff, the statute of limitations under this section is
tolled while the individual potential plaintiff is incapacitated by the use of
an illegal drug to the extent that the individual cannot reasonably be
expected to seek recovery under this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.
(b)  For a defendant, the statute of limitations under this section is tolled
until six months after the individual potential defendant is convicted of a
criminal drug offense or as otherwise provided by law.
(3)  The statute of limitations under this chapter for a claim based on
participation in the illegal drug market that occurred prior to the effective
date of this chapter does not begin to run until the effective date of this
chapter.
